Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Chapter 6 Municipal Courts

Cross references. —

As to appointment and salaries of police justices in first-class cities, see §§

15-3-204

and

15-3-205

.

As to appointment and salaries of police judges under commission form of government, see §

15-4-105

.

As to appointment, jurisdiction and salaries of municipal judges under the manager form of government, see §

15-4-202

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

20 Am. Jur. 2d Courts §§ 12, 16, 17.

Malicious prosecution: defense of acting on advice of justice of the peace, magistrate or lay person, 48 ALR4th 250.

21 C.J.S. Courts § 102; 62 C.J.S. Municipal Corporations § 69.